Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 60
U.S. AGENCY OBLIGATIONS

Section

11-60-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Bank for cooperatives" means the corporation known as the central bank for cooperatives and any bank for cooperatives organized and chartered by the governor of the farm credit administration pursuant to the "Farm Credit Act of 1933", as amended.

"Debenture" means an instrument evidencing an obligation issued by a federal intermediate credit bank pursuant to the "Federal Farm Loan Act", as amended, or by a bank for cooperatives pursuant to the "Farm Credit Act of 1933", as amended, and includes consolidated debentures issued by federal intermediate credit banks acting together or banks for cooperatives acting together.

"Federal intermediate credit bank" means any federal intermediate credit bank chartered by the farm credit administration pursuant to the "Federal Farm Loan Act", as amended.

"Funds" includes but is not limited to any moneys or deposits, or any fiduciary, sinking, insurance, investment, retirement, compensation, pension, estate, trust, or other funds, public or private.

(4.5) "Person" means any individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, or legal entity other than a public body or officer.

"Public bodies or officers" includes but is not limited to the state of Colorado and any of its institutions, agencies, counties, municipalities, districts, and any political subdivision, department, agency, or instrumentality thereof, and any political or public corporation, board, commission, or officer.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 520, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 83-3-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 83-3-1.

L. 89:

(4.5) added, p. 1107, § 8, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the "Farm Credit Act of 1933", see Pub.L. 73-75, codified at 12 U.S.C. § 1131 et seq.; the "Federal Farm Loan Act", referenced in this section, was repealed in 1971 by the "Farm Credit Act of 1971", which also provided that references to the Farm Loan Act "shall be deemed to refer to the comparable provisions" of the "Farm Credit Act of 1971", Pub.L. 92-181, codified at 12 U.S.C. § 2001 et seq.

11-60-102. Debentures - legal investments - federal intermediate credit banks - bank for cooperatives.

It is lawful, notwithstanding any restrictions on investments contained in any of the laws of this state, for any bank, trust company, savings bank, savings and loan association, insurance company, credit union, or person, including but not limited to those doing business under any banking, insurance, deposit, fiduciary, or investment laws of the United States or any of the states thereof, to invest any funds in its, his, or their custody, control, or possession in any debentures or other similar obligations issued by a federal intermediate credit bank or by a bank for cooperatives and to use any such debentures as security for public deposits or any other fund in their custody, control, or possession.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 521, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 83-3-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 83-3-2.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1107, § 9, effective July 1.

11-60-103. Lawful investments - international banks.

It is lawful, notwithstanding any restrictions on investments contained in any of the laws of this state, for any bank, trust company, savings bank, savings and loan association, insurance company, credit union, or person, including but not limited to those doing business under any banking, insurance, deposit, fiduciary, or investment laws of the United States or of any of the states thereof, to invest any funds in its, his, or their custody, control, or possession in the obligations of the international bank for reconstruction and development, the inter-American development bank, the Asian development bank, or the African development bank.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 521, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 83-3-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 83-3-3.

L. 67:

p. 564, § 1.

L. 69:

p. 690, § 1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 462, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1107, § 10, effective July 1.

11-60-104. Article controlling.

Insofar as the provisions of this article are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this article are controlling; but nothing in this article shall be construed as modifying part 3 of article 1 of title 15, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 521, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 83-3-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 83-3-4.